Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB37.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1971YC (3) 91 th/ns H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 321.182, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 a. Make application on a form provided by the department 3 which shall include the applicantâs full name, signature, 4 current mailing address, current residential address, date 5 of birth, social security number, status as a citizen of the 6 United States or status as a noncitizen authorized to be in 7 the United States, and physical description including sex, 8 height, and eye color. The application may contain other 9 information the department may require by rule. Pursuant to 10 procedures established by the department and for an applicant 11 who is a foreign national temporarily present in this state, 12 the department may waive the requirement that the application 13 include the applicantâs social security number. 14 Sec. 2. Section 321.189, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 15 2025, is amended to read as follows: 16 a. (1) Appearing on the driverâs license shall be a 17 distinguishing number assigned to the licensee; the licenseeâs 18 full name, date of birth, sex, and residence address; a color 19 photograph; a physical description of the licensee; the name of 20 the state; the dates of issuance and expiration; and the usual 21 signature of the licensee. The license shall identify the 22 class of vehicle the licensee may operate and the applicable 23 endorsements and restrictions which the department shall 24 require by rule. 25 (2) The back side of the driverâs license must include the 26 licenseeâs status as a citizen of the United States or status 27 as a noncitizen authorized to be in the United States, as 28 applicable. 29 Sec. 3. Section 321.190, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 30 2025, is amended to read as follows: 31 a. The department shall, upon application and payment 32 of the required fee, issue to an applicant a nonoperatorâs 33 identification card. To be valid the card shall bear a 34 distinguishing number other than a social security number 35 -1- LSB 1971YC (3) 91 th/ns 1/ 2 H.F. _____ assigned to the cardholder, the full name, date of birth, 1 sex, residence address, a physical description and a color 2 photograph of the cardholder, the usual signature of the 3 cardholder, and such other information as the department may 4 require by rule. The back side of the card must include the 5 cardholderâs status as a citizen of the United States or status 6 as a noncitizen authorized to be in the United States, as 7 applicable. An applicant for a nonoperatorâs identification 8 card shall apply for the card in the manner provided in section 9 321.182, subsections 1 through 3 . The card shall be issued to 10 the applicant at the time of application pursuant to procedures 11 established by rule. An applicant for a nonoperatorâs 12 identification card who is required by 50 U.S.C. app. Â§451 13 et seq. to register with the United States selective service 14 system shall be registered by the department with the selective 15 service system as provided in section 321.183 . 16 Sec. 4. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to driverâs 17 licenses and nonoperatorâs identification cards issued as a 18 result of an application made, including for renewal, on or 19 after the effective date of this Act. 20